Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7438
Manufacturer, defined.

Manufacturer means any entity engaged in manufacturing, preparing, propagating, processing, packaging, repackaging, or labeling a prescription drug.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7410;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 55.